Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 6 Carnivals, Circuses, Pawnbrokers, Poolrooms and Bowling Alleys

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title. See §

33-1-106

in connection with this chapter.

As to itinerant, temporary or transient merchants, see chapter 20 of this title.

As to designation of property in transit in books and records for purposes of taxation, see §

39-13-103

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53A Am. Jur. 2d Moneylenders and Pawnbrokers §§ 1 to 8.

§ 33-6-101.
Carnivals and circuses; license required; safety inspection.

No person shall open any circus or carnival entertainment if any entrance fee or fee for carnival or circus rides is charged or collected, without first obtaining a license as required by this act provided that nothing in this act shall prohibit a licensing authority from refusing to issue any license authorized by this act in the sole discretion of the governing body.

Before issuing any license under this act to any circus or carnival specified under subsection (a) of this section, the board of county commissioners for any county and the governing body of any city or town may require and provide for the inspection of the safety of the applicant’s facilities, equipment, rides or other structures which are for public use. Public use of any facility, equipment, ride or other structure determined unsafe following inspection is prohibited until the unsafe condition is corrected, repaired or otherwise modified. Failure of the applicant to make necessary corrections, repairs or modifications pursuant to this subsection shall be grounds for disapproval of the license application under this act.

As used in this act:

“Carnival” means any traveling enterprise offering a variety of rides and amusements to the public for a fee;

“Circus” means a tent-covered or open air arena used for providing public entertainment at a charge and generally featuring feats of physical skill and daring, wild animal acts and performances by clowns;

“This act” means W.S.

33-6-101

through

33-6-104

.

The issuance of a license pursuant to this act shall not relieve any licensee from acting with reasonable care in the operation or maintenance of a circus or carnival. The licensing authority as a condition of issuing a license under this section, shall require a licensee to provide proof of liability insurance coverage of a minimum amount of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) at the time of issuing the license and to indemnify, defend and save harmless the city, town or county from any and all claims, demands, actions or causes of action arising from the negligent acts or omission of the carnival or circus. All licensees must maintain liability insurance while operating within the state of Wyoming.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 76, § 12; R.S. 1887, § 1445; Laws 1899, ch. 91, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2175; C.S. 1910, § 2853; C.S. 1920, § 3386; Laws 1929, ch. 15, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 65-208; C.S. 1945, § 37-308; W.S. 1957, § 33-69; Laws 1987, ch. 180, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to imposition of license tax on businesses by cities and towns, see § 15-1-103(a)(xiii).

§ 33-6-102.
Carnivals and circuses; application for licenses; fees.

Any person or persons, company or corporation opening an exhibition as provided in W.S.

33-6-101

, shall first be required to make application for a license therefor to the board of county commissioners of the county in which such exhibition is sought to be opened, and if allowed, such license shall be issued, upon receipt of such license fee as the board shall have deemed proper, to be not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200.00) for each day of such exhibition.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 91, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2177; C.S. 1910, § 2855; C.S. 1920, § 3388; Laws 1929, ch. 15, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 65-209; C.S. 1945, § 37-309; W.S. 1957, § 33-70.

§ 33-6-103.
Carnivals and circuses; penalty.

Any person or persons, company or corporation opening or maintaining such an exhibition as specified in W.S.

33-6-101

, without having complied with W.S.

33-6-102

, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00), nor more than four hundred dollars ($400.00). Each day of the continuance of such violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 15, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 65-210; C.S. 1945, § 37-310; W.S. 1957, § 33-71.

§ 33-6-104.
Carnivals and circuses; local ordinances.

It shall be lawful for any incorporated city or town in this state to provide by ordinance that any person or persons, company or corporation, opening within the confines of such city or town, any exhibition as provided in W.S.

33-6-101

, shall first be required to make application for a license therefor, to the council of said city or town, in which such exhibition is sought to be opened, and if allowed, such license shall be issued upon the receipt of such license fee as the council shall have deemed proper, to be not less than five dollars ($5.00), nor more than two hundred dollars ($200.00) for each day of such exhibition; provided, that such license obtained from such city or town shall be in addition to that obtained from the county in which such city or town is situated.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 15, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 65-211; C.S. 1945, § 37-311; W.S 1957, § 33-72.

§ 33-6-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 62, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1882, ch. 64, § 1, related to pawnbroker and intelligence office licenses.

§ 33-6-106.
Records of pawnbrokers.

Every pawnbroker engaged in the business of accepting pawns or pledges shall keep an accurate record showing a complete description of all articles pawned or purchased, the date of the pawn or purchase, the name and address, or names and addresses of the persons pawning, selling or pledging any article, the amount for which same is pledged or purchased by the pawnbroker and the date upon which the pledge expires. This record shall be available at all times to any peace officer of the city, county or state.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 16, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 82-101; C.S. 1945, § 37-313; W.S. 1957, § 33-74.

§ 33-6-107.
Penalty for violation of section 33-6-106.

Any pawnbroker failing to comply with the requirements of W.S.

33-6-106

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months or by both fine and imprisonment, together with costs of prosecution.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 16, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 82-102; C.S. 1945, § 37-314; W.S. 1957, § 33-75.

§ 33-6-108.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 138, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1882, ch. 64, § 1, related to poolrooms and bowling alleys.